Utah statutes.
59-2-507.   Land included as agricultural -- Site of farmhouse excluded -- Taxation of structures and site of farmhouse.

(1)  Land under barns, sheds, silos, cribs, greenhouses and like structures, lakes, dams, ponds, streams, and irrigation ditches and like facilities is included in determining the total area of land actively devoted to agricultural use.  Land which is under the farmhouse and land used in connection with the farmhouse is excluded from that determination.

(2)  All structures which are located on land in agricultural use, the farmhouse and the land on which the farmhouse is located, and land used in connection with the farmhouse, shall be valued, assessed, and taxed using the same standards, methods, and procedures that apply to other taxable structures and other land in the county.



Amended by Chapter 9, 2001 General Session

